src/morphology/stems/altstem-adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective stem variation and allomorph selection
!! ~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
!! Adjective stems are formed like noun stems, with similar patterns. Adjectives
!! have additionally the productive comparative derivations, which may have
!! their own stems, particularly an e-stem for a-stem words. The examples in
!! this chapter are the same set of cases as with nouns:
!! singular nominative, singular essive, singular inessive, plural essive,
!! plural elative, singular partitives, singular illatives, plural partitives
!! plural genitives, plural illatives and the compound forms. And also the
!! comparative derivations: comparative singular nominative and superlative
!! singular nominative.
!!

LEXICON A_TUMMAHKO
!! Adjective stems without stem variation
!! ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^
!! The most basic adjective stems do not have any stem internal variation
!! and use few commonest allomorphs. The word in this class end in o and are
!! bi-syllabic or end in moderative hko- suffix, and do not have gradating 
!! consonants.
!! € tummahko tummahko+A+Sg+Nom darkish
!! € tummahkona tummahko+A+Sg+Ess
!! € tummahkossa tummahko+A+Sg+Ine
!! € tummahkoina tummahko+A+Pl+Ess
!! € tummahkoista tummahko+A+Pl+Ine
!! € tummahkoa tummahko+A+Sg+Par
!! $ tummahkota
!! € tummahkoon tummahko+A+Sg+Ill
!! $ tummahkohon
!! $ tummahkoseen
!! € tummahkoja tummahko+A+Pl+Par
!! $ tummahkoita
!! € tummahkojen tummahko+A+Pl+Gen
!! $ tummahkoiden
!! $ tummahkoitten
!! € tummahkoihin tummahko+A+Pl+Ill
!! $ tummahkoisiin
0  A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0  A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0  A_BACK_PLURALS ;
0  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0  A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_VALKAISTU
!! The stems ending in u are also without variation. And the bisyllabic ones,
!! as well as those formed by nut participle passive^s back vowel versions
!! after s stemmed verb are in this class
!! € valkaistu valkaistu+A+Sg+Nom bleached
!! € valkaistua valkaistu+A+Sg+Par
!! € valkaistuun valkaistu+A+Sg+Ill
!! € valkaistuna valkaistu+A+Sg+Ess
!! € valkaistussa valkaistu+A+Sg+Ine
!! € valkaistuja valkaistu+A+Pl+Par
!! € valkaistujen valkaistu+A+Pl+Gen
!! € valkaistuihin valkaistu+A+Pl+Ill
!! € valkaistuina valkaistu+A+Pl+Ine
!! € valkaistuissa valkaistu+A+Pl+Ine
0  A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0  A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0  A_BACK_PLURALS ;
0  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN    ;
0  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0  A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE   ;

LEXICON A_HÄPÄISTY
!! The variationless y stems are basically fronted version of u; they
!! come from bisyllabic adjectives ending in y or the nut participle^s passive
!! in an s stemmed front voweled verb. The traditional dictionary class is
!! € häpäisty häpäisty+A+Sg+Nom defiled
!! € häpäistyä häpäisty+A+Sg+Par
!! € häpäistyyn häpäisty+A+Sg+Ill
!! € häpäistynä häpäisty+A+Sg+Ess
!! € häpäistyssä häpäisty+A+Sg+Ine
!! € häpäistyjä häpäisty+A+Pl+Par
!! € häpäistyjen häpäisty+A+Pl+Gen
!! € häpäistyihin häpäisty+A+Pl+Ill
!! € häpäistyinä häpäisty+A+Pl+Ess
!! € häpäistyissä häpäisty+A+Pl+Ine
0  A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0  A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0  A_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0  A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN    ;
0  A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0  A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE   ;

LEXICON A_HÖLÖ
!! Likewise the variationless ö stem is fronted version of the corresponding o
!! stem; bisyllabic or made with moderative hkö suffix in front voweled word.
!! € hölö hölö+A+Sg+Nom blabbermouth
!! € hölöä hölö+A+Sg+Par
!! € hölöön hölö+A+Sg+Ill
!! € hölönä hölö+A+Sg+Ess
!! € hölössä hölö+A+Sg+Ine
!! € hölöjä hölö+A+Pl+Par
!! € hölöjen hölö+A+Pl+Gen
!! € hölöihin hölö+A+Pl+Ill
!! € hölöinä hölö+A+Pl+Ess
!! € hölöissä hölö+A+Pl+Ine
0  A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0  A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0  A_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0  A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0  A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0  A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE   ;

LEXICON A_TOOPE
!! The new words with e stem have same allomorphy selection as old short
!! unchanging bisyllabic u, y, o and ö stems, and no stem-internal variation.
!! € toope toope+A+Sg+Nom doofus
!! € toopea toope+A+Sg+Par
!! € toopeen toope+A+Sg+Ill
!! € toopeja toope+A+Pl+Par
!! € toopejen toope+A+Pl+Gen
!! € toopeihin toope+A+Pl+Ill
!! They also have slightly greater probability for archaic form of plural
!! genitive:
!! € toopein, toope+A+Pl+Gen
0  A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0  A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0  A_BACK_PLURALS ;
0  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0  A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0  A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;


LEXICON A_BEIGE
!! As with front vowels.
!! € beige beige+A+Sg+Nom beige
0    A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0    A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0    A_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0    A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0    A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0    A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0    A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0    A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;


LEXICON A_KOHELO
!! The trisyllabic and longer words with stem vowel o have no stem variation
!! either, but selection of suffix allomorphs for plural genitives and
!! partitives is wider than for disyllabic ones. The tradtitional dictionary
!! € tohelo tohelo+A+Sg+Nom clumsy
!! € toheloita tohelo+A+Pl+Par
!! € toheloja tohelo+A+Pl+Par
!! € tohelojen tohelo+A+Pl+Gen
!! € toheloiden tohelo+Pl+Gen
!! € toheloitten tohelo+Pl+Gen
0  A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0  A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0  A_BACK_PLURALS ;
0  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA    ;
0  A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0  A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0  A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_LÖPERÖ
!! And the trisyllabic ö stem as counter part of o stem. The dictionary class
!! € löperö löperö+A+Sg+Nom sloppy
!! € löperöjen löperö+A+Pl+Gen
!! € löperöiden löperö+A+Pl+Gen
!! € löperöitten löperö+A+Pl+Gen
0  A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0  A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0  A_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0  A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0  A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0  A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0  A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0  A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_AUTIO
!! The words with stem vowel o preceded by vowels still have no more stem
!! variation than other cases, but give yet another pattern of allomorphs for
!! singular and plural partitives and plural genitive. The dictionary class
!! € autio autio+A+Sg+Nom deserted
!! $ autioa
!! € autiota autio+A+Sg+Par
!! € autioita autio+A+Pl+Par
!! $ autiojen
!! € autioiden autio+A+Pl+Gen
!! € autioitten autio+A+Pl+Gen
0  A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0  A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0  A_BACK_PLURALS ;
0  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0  A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA    ;
0  A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0  A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0  A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE    ;

LEXICON A_RIIVIÖ
!! The front voweled stems with ö after vowels work like their back vowel
!! € riiviö riiviö+A+Sg+Nom nasty
!! € riiviötä riiviö+A+Sg+Par
!! € riiviöiden riiviö+A+Pl+Gen
!! € riiviöitten riiviö+A+Pl+Gen
0  A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0  A_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0  A_FRONT_PLURALS ;
0  A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
0  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN    ;
0  A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ    ;
0  A_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0  A_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0  A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0  A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE   ;
0  A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE    ;

!LEXICON A_XXXIE
!! There are no examples of new loan word adjectives ending in long vowel
!! stem that would fit into dictionary class **3**, omorfi subclass **A3ea**.
!0    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!0    A_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
!0    A_BACK_PLURALS ;
!0    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
!0    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
!0    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA    ;
!0    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
!0    A_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
!0    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;

!!
!! Furthermore there are no examples of adjectives in other classes without
!! stem variation yet.
!!

!! Adjective stems with Consonant gradation as only stem variation
!! ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^
LEXICON A_KOLKKO
!! The quantitative gradation of k in basic changes stems for locative cases:
!! € kolkko kolkko+A+Sg+Nom gloomy
!! € kolkossa kolkko+A+Sg+Ine
!! € kolkoista kolkko+A+Pl+Ela
!! € kolkkoihin kolkko+A+Pl+Ill
0:o    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:o    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:o    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:o    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:o    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:o    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:o    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON    ;
0:o    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:o    A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
0:o    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:o    A_BACK_COMPARATIVE   ;
0:o    A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE   ;


LEXICON A_VIRKKU
!! Similarly for u stems with quantitative k gradation:
!! € virkku virkku+A+Sg+Nom ???
!! € virkussa virkku+A+Sg+Ine
!! € virkuista virkku+A+Pl+Ela
!! € virkkuihin virkku+A+Pl+Ill
0:u        A_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:u        A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
0:u        A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
0:u        A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:u        A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:u        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
0:u        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN ;
0:u        A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:u        A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:u        A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:u        A_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
0:u        A_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;


LEXICON A_SÄIKKY
!! As with y and k:
!! € säikky säikky+A+Sg+Nom ???
!! € säikyssä säikky+A+Sg+Ine
!! € säikyistä säikky+A+Pl+Ela
!! € säikkyihin säikky+A+Pl+Ill
0:y        A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:y        A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
0:y        A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
0:y        A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:y        A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:y        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:y        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN ;
0:y        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
0:y        A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:y        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:y        A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE ;
0:y        A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE ;

LEXICON A_KÖKKÖ
!! And ö with k:
!! € kökkö kökkö+A+Sg+Nom ???
!! € kökössä kökkö+A+Sg+Ine
!! € kököistä kökkö+A+Pl+Ela
!! € kökköihin kökkö+A+Pl+Ill
0:ö        A_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÖN ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_COMPARATIVE ;
0:ö        A_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE ;

!LEXICON A_XXKKE
!! there is no unvarying e final adjective with k ~ 0 gradation.
!ke    A_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
!ke    A_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
!ke:e    A_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
!ke    A_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
!ke:e    A_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
!ke    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
!ke    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
!ke    A_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
!ke    A_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN    ;
!ke    A_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
!ke    A_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
!
!
